02_Morphology/grn.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%>                   ! Frontera de morfema
%<n%>                ! Nombre
%<nom%>              ! Nominativo
%<gen%>              ! Genitivo
%<loc%>              ! Locativo
%<comp%>             ! Comparatif
%{m%}                ! Archiphoneme m p
%<der_kue%>          ! Derivational
%<pl%>               ! Plural
%{n%}                ! Archiphoneme 0 n
%{g%}                ! Archiphoneme k g
%{s%}                ! Spanish lex
%{d%}                ! Nasal indication for digit
%<num%>              ! Numeral

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;
DIGITLEX ;

LEXICON N

%<n%>: CASE ;

%<n%>: SUBST ;

%<n%>: PL ;

LEXICON CASE

%<nom%>: # ; ! ""
%<gen%>:%>gua # ; ! "de"
%<loc%>:%>%{m%}e # ; ! "a, en"
%<comp%>:%>icha # ; ! "more"


LEXICON PL

%<pl%>:%>%{n%}%{g%}uéra CASE ;


LEXICON SUBST

%<der_kue%>:%>kue # "weight: 1.0" ;


LEXICON N-SPA

:%{s%} N ;


LEXICON Nouns

ava:ava N ; ! "raza, gente"
óga:óga N ; ! "casa"
irũ:irũ N ; ! "amigo"
apyka:apyka N ; ! "silla"
tembiasa:tembiasa N ; ! "experiencia"
tembiasakue:tembiasakue N ; ! "historia"
akãvai:akãvai N ; ! "locura"
ja:ja N ; ! "ocasión"
jagua:jagua N ; ! "perro"
asociación:asociación N-SPA ; ! "association"
declaración:declaración N-SPA ; ! "declaration"



LEXICON NUM-DIGIT

%<num%>:%- CASE ;


LEXICON LOOP

LAST-DIGIT ;
DIGITLEX ;


LEXICON LAST-DIGIT

%0:%0%{d%} NUM-DIGIT ; ! "papaʼỹ"
1:1%{d%} NUM-DIGIT ; ! "peteĩ"
2:2 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "mokõi"
3:3 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "mbohapy"
4:4 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "irundy"
5:5 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "po"
6:6%{d%} NUM-DIGIT ; ! "poteĩ"
7:7 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "pokõi"
8:8 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "poapy"
9:9 NUM-DIGIT ; ! "porundy"


LEXICON DIGITLEX

%0:%0 LOOP ;
1:1   LOOP ;
2:2   LOOP ;
3:3   LOOP ;
4:4   LOOP ;
5:5   LOOP ;
6:6   LOOP ;
7:7   LOOP ;
8:8   LOOP ;
9:9   LOOP ;
